Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 6. PREVENTING OFFENSES BY THE ACT OF MAGISTRATES AND OTHER OFFICERS; EDUCATION CONCERNING CONSEQUENCES OF CERTAIN OFFENSES

Art. 6.01. WHEN MAGISTRATE HEARS THREAT. It is the duty of every magistrate, when he may have heard, in any manner, that a threat has been made by one person to do some injury to himself or the person or property of another, including the person or property of his spouse, immediately to give notice to some peace officer, in order that such peace officer may use lawful means to prevent the injury.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 366, ch. 164, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Art. 6.02. THREAT TO TAKE LIFE. If, within the hearing of a magistrate, one person shall threaten to take the life of another, including that of his spouse, or himself, the magistrate shall issue a warrant for the arrest of the person making the threat, or in case of emergency, he may himself immediately arrest such person.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 366, ch. 164, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Art. 6.03. ON ATTEMPT TO INJURE. Whenever, in the presence or within the observation of a magistrate, an attempt is made by one person to inflict an injury upon himself or to the person or property of another, including the person or property of his spouse, it is his duty to use all lawful means to prevent the injury. This may be done, either by verbal order to a peace officer to interfere and prevent the injury, or by the issuance of an order of arrest against the offender, or by arresting the offender; for which purpose he may call upon all persons present to assist in making the arrest.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 366, ch. 164, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Art. 6.04. MAY COMPEL OFFENDER TO GIVE SECURITY. When the person making such threat is brought before a magistrate, he may compel him to give security to keep the peace, or commit him to custody.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 6.05. DUTY OF PEACE OFFICER AS TO THREATS. It is the duty of every peace officer, when he may have been informed in any manner that a threat has been made by one person to do some injury to himself or to the person or property of another, including the person or property of his spouse, to prevent the threatened injury, if within his power; and, in order to do this, he may call in aid any number of citizens in his county. He may take such measures as the person about to be injured might for the prevention of the offense.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 366, ch. 164, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Art. 6.06. PEACE OFFICER TO PREVENT INJURY. Whenever, in the presence of a peace officer, or within his view, one person is about to commit an offense against the person or property of another, including the person or property of his spouse, or injure himself, it is his duty to prevent it; and, for this purpose the peace officer may summon any number of the citizens of his county to his aid. The peace officer must use the amount of force necessary to prevent the commission of the offense, and no greater.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 366, ch. 164, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Art. 6.07. CONDUCT OF PEACE OFFICER. The conduct of peace officers, in preventing offenses about to be committed in their presence, or within their view, is to be regulated by the same rules as are prescribed to the action of the person about to be injured. They may use all force necessary to repel the aggression.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., vol. 2, p. 317, ch. 722.

Art. 6.10. EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS CONCERNING CERTAIN OFFENSES COMMITTED BY MINORS; MANDATORY COURT ATTENDANCE. (a) In this article, "parent" means a natural or adoptive parent, managing or possessory conservator, or legal guardian. The term does not include a parent whose parental rights have been terminated.

(b) This article applies to a defendant who has not had the disabilities of minority removed and has been charged with an offense under Section 43.261, Penal Code.

(c) The judge of a county court:

(1) must take the defendant's plea in open court; and

(2) shall issue a summons to compel the defendant's parent to be present during:

(A) the taking of the defendant's plea; and

(B) all other proceedings relating to the case.

(d) If a county court finds that a defendant has committed an offense under Section 43.261, Penal Code, the court may enter an order requiring the defendant to attend and successfully complete an educational program described by Section 37.218, Education Code, or another equivalent educational program.

(e) A court that enters an order under Subsection (d) shall require the defendant or the defendant's parent to pay the cost of attending an educational program under Subsection (d) if the court determines that the defendant or the defendant's parent is financially able to make payment.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1322 (S.B. 407), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Code of Criminal Procedure, Art/Sec 6.09 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(5), eff. September 1, 2013.